Connecticut, session 2026, SB00439.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. Section 31-48b of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
(a) For purposes of this section, "employer" means the owner or
owners in the case of an unincorporated business, the partners in the
case of a partnership, the officers in the case of a corporation or in the
case of the state, any town, city or borough, or district, local or regional
board of education, or housing authority or district department of
health, the chief executive officer thereof.
(b) No employer or agent or representative of an employer shall
operate any electronic surveillance device or system, including, but not
limited to, the recording of sound or voice or a closed circuit television
system, or any combination thereof, for the purpose of recording or
monitoring the activities of [his] employees in areas designed for the
health or personal comfort of the employees or for safeguarding of their
possessions, such as rest rooms, locker rooms or lounges, except a third-
party vendor that operates a self-service kiosk located in such lounges

Substitute Senate Bill No. 439
may operate an electronic surveillance device or system in such lounges
if such electronic surveillance device or system (1) does not record
sound or voice, and (2) only records the (A) checkout area of such self-
service kiosk, and (B) area where products are displayed for sale. Such
third-party vendor shall maintain sole custody of any video collected by
such electronic surveillance. No third-party vendor shall release or
provide access to any portion of such video except where permitted by
the provisions of this section or otherwise required by law. No employer
or agent or representative of an employer shall request to view any such
video or use any such video in a disciplinary action, except where there
has been an alleged theft by an employee reported by a third-party
vendor. For purposes of this section, "self-service kiosk" means an
interactive, stand-alone terminal that allows individuals to
independently scan and purchase items for sale.
(c) Any employer or third-party vendor who violates any provision
of subsection (b) of this section shall, for the first offense, be fined five
hundred dollars, for the second offense, be fined one thousand dollars
and, for the third and any subsequent offense, be fined one thousand
dollars and imprisoned thirty days.
(d) No employer or [his] such employer's agent or representative and
no employee or [his] such employee's agent or representative shall
intentionally overhear or record a conversation or discussion pertaining
to employment contract negotiations between the two parties, by means
of any instrument, device or equipment, unless such party has the
consent of all parties to such conversation or discussion.
(e) Any employer or [his] such employer's agent or representative or
any employee or [his] such employee's agent or representative who
violates any provision of subsection (d) of this section shall be fined one
thousand dollars or imprisoned one year, or both.
Public Act No. 26-89 2 of 3

Substitute Senate Bill No. 439
Governor's Action:
Approved June 2, 2026
Public Act No. 26-89 3 of 3